California, session 20252026, AB665.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 90018 of the Financial Code is amended to read:90018. (a) The commissioner shall prepare and publish on the department’s internet website an annual report detailing actions taken during the prior year under this law.(b) The report described in subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, information on actions taken with respect to all of the following:(1) Rulemaking, enforcement, oversight, consumer complaints and resolutions, education, and research.(2) The activities of the Financial Technology Innovation Office.(3) The activities of the Office of the Ombuds.(c) The report may include recommendations, including those intended to result in improved oversight, greater transparency, or increased availability of beneficial financial products and services in the marketplace.